Tennessee statutes. Title 46 Cemeteries
Part 2

Financial Management

46-1-201. Purpose of part.

It is the purpose of this part to require cemetery companies in the state to carry at all times a sufficient improvement care trust fund to maintain, keep up and beautify the cemeteries, without commercializing the operation of the cemeteries, and to maintain a pre-need merchandise and services trust fund to ensure that the pre-need sale of cemetery merchandise and services is properly accounted for and administered.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 11; mod. Code 1932, § 3933; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-117; T.C.A., §§ 46-217, 46-2-117; T.C.A. § 46-2-301; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2016, ch. 911, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-301 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 8.

46-1-202. Fidelity bond coverage — Exemptions.

Every cemetery company shall carry fidelity bond coverage of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or a higher amount that the commissioner deems sufficient for officers and employees who handle money and securities.

The annual financial report required by § 46-1-214 to be filed with the commissioner shall indicate the amount of fidelity bond coverage, the classes of employees included, name of carrier and policy number, and the expiration date of coverage.

Cemeteries with combined funds, defined as cash, investments and assets, of less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) may apply to the commissioner for an exemption from meeting the requirements of subsections (a) and (b). The commissioner may grant an exemption upon receiving satisfactory documentation demonstrating that all financial transactions, including withdrawals from the pre-need merchandise and services trust fund or operating funds, require the signatures of two (2) or more designated cemetery officials.

If any cemetery that is currently exempt should, at any time in the future, obtain combined funds in excess of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), the cemetery shall, within sixty (60) days of notification of the commissioner, obtain the fidelity bond required by subsections (a) and (b).

Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3.

46-1-203. Requirements for organization — Improvement care fund deposit.

No person or group of persons shall engage in the business of owning and operating a cemetery company, except as authorized by this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, and without first:

If an entity required to register with or obtain any form of approval from the secretary of state, obtaining the registration or approval and retaining the registration and approval in an active status as long as the cemetery company is owned and operated by the applicant;

Entering into a trust agreement in accordance with § 46-1-204; and

Depositing either cash or a surety bond approved by the commissioner in its improvement care trust fund, in an amount to be determined according to the population of the county in which the cemetery is located, as estimated by the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, as follows:

10,000 or under $ 40,000

10,001 to 15,000 60,000

15,001 to 20,000 80,000

20,001 to 100,000 100,000

100,001 or more 200,000.

The requirements of this section shall also be applicable to any existing cemetery company that establishes or opens a new cemetery, or an addition to an existing cemetery, on or after January 1, 2007.

Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.05); 1968, ch. 557, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; 1976, ch. 773, § 2; T.C.A., § 46-105; Acts 1986, ch. 693, §§ 1, 6; T.C.A. § 46-1-105; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-1-105 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

46-1-204. Improvement care trust fund.

Every cemetery company engaged in the business of selling, leasing, or renting lots, grave spaces, crypts, niches, and burial rights in this state shall establish and forever maintain an improvement care trust fund to provide for the improvement, care, and maintenance of the following:

Each separate cemetery;

Each separate geographical location of each cemetery owned and operated by the cemetery company; and

Each separate geographical location of a funeral home, or other individual or entity, that has niches or other areas or devices of interment for sale, lease, or rent.

The trust fund required by this subsection (a) shall be established by executing a written trust agreement with a trust company approved by the commissioner, or with a state or national bank, or with savings and loan associations having insurance of accounts as required by law; provided, that a cemetery company may change the trustee of its trust fund by providing written notice to the commissioner no later than thirty (30) days prior to the change, along with sufficient evidence, as determined by the commissioner, that the trustee will be able to comply with the requirements of this chapter. If the commissioner determines that the evidence submitted is insufficient to ensure that the trustee will be able to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner may refuse to allow the cemetery company to change the trustee.

The written trust agreement shall specifically state the following:

The nature and extent of care to be furnished;

That the care shall be furnished only to the extent that the net income derived from the amount deposited in the trust permits; and

That within thirty (30) days of a transaction, not less than the following minimum amounts will be set aside and deposited in trust by the cemetery company:

For land, but not including lawn crypts or land donated without charge for the purpose of interring the remains of a deceased person who was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time of death, one dollar ($1.00) per square foot of the land sold or twenty percent (20%) of the total transaction amount for the land, whichever is greater;

For a lawn crypt, twenty percent (20%) of the total transaction amount for the land excluding the lawn crypt or fifty dollars ($50.00), whichever is greater;

For a mausoleum, crypt, niche, or any memorial other than a commodity, not less than ten percent (10%) of the total transaction amount for each item;

For the special care of any lot, grave, crypt, or niche or of a family mausoleum, memorial, marker or monument, the full amount received;

For a commodity, the full amount received for memorial care; and

For the sale of land for non-cemetery purposes, the commissioner may order the cemetery company disposing of the land to deposit up to one hundred percent (100%) of the net proceeds of the disposition in the cemetery's improvement care trust fund or the cemetery's pre-need merchandise and services trust fund, or both, within thirty (30) days after the disposition, if there is a deficiency in either trust fund. The order may not exceed the actual amount of the deficiency in the improvement care trust fund or the pre-need merchandise and services trust fund, or both;

Notwithstanding anything in this chapter to the contrary, any cemetery company depositing more than the required amounts in its improvement care trust fund, in accordance with prior statutory requirements or its charter or contracts, shall be authorized to continue to do so; provided, that deliberate advance payments made to the improvement care fund shall not be credited toward any future liability, except that a cemetery company may credit any payment, which was deposited into the improvement care trust fund from a contract that was subsequently canceled, toward any future liability as long as the credit is applied within twelve (12) months from the date of the cancellation date.

Every cemetery company shall be permitted to charge a fee for the memorial care of every commodity installed in the cemetery. The fee shall not exceed twenty-three cents (23¢) per square inch of the ground covered by the commodity. At the end of each calendar year, the cemetery company shall be permitted to increase its fee for the memorial care of commodities by no more than the percentage representing the consumer price index at the end of that calendar year. The fee charged for memorial care of a commodity shall not exceed the fee charged by the cemetery company for installation of the commodity. The charge for memorial care of a commodity shall be the same to all, regardless of the source of the commodity.

The setting aside and deposit provided for in subdivision (b)(3)(A) shall be made by the cemetery company not later than thirty (30) days after the close of the month in which the final payment on the purchase price of each lot, grave space, crypt or niche, the final payment for the general or special care of the lot, grave space, crypt or niche, the final payment for the memorial care of a commodity, or the final payment of a family mausoleum, memorial, marker or monument is received. The amounts deposited shall be held by the trustee of the improvement care funds of the cemetery in trust and perpetuity for the specific purposes stated in the written agreement. All deposits with a trustee by a cemetery company under this part shall be in cash only.

As used in this subsection (e), unless the context otherwise requires:

“Net earnings” means:

All net income, excluding capital gains; or

An amount not exceeding five percent (5%) of the fair market value of the trust as of the last day of the trust fiscal year immediately preceding the distribution year. This amount is not reduced by taxes or fees, unless the fees exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the market value of the trust as of the last day of the trust fiscal year immediately preceding the distribution year. If any fees exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the market value of the trust as of the last day of the preceding fiscal year, then the amount of the disbursement shall be reduced by the excess; and

“Net income” means the collected dividends, interest and other income of the trust reduced by taxes on income and fees.

The net earnings of each improvement care trust fund shall be paid to and shall be used and expended by the owners or officers and directors of the cemetery company, or by the trustee of the improvement care trust fund while the cemetery is not being operated by its owner, for the improvement care, as defined in § 46-1-102, of the cemetery or separate geographical location of the cemetery for which the fund was established and for no other purpose.

While a cemetery for which an improvement care trust has been funded is not being operated by its owner, the trustee may disburse net income from the trust to compensate any responsible person for work performed or expenses incurred in the improvement care of the cemetery. In investing these funds, the trustee shall exercise the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing that persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income and capital appreciation as well as the probable safety of their capital. Within the limitations of the standard in this subdivision (e)(3), subject to any express provisions of limitations contained in any particular trust instrument, the trustee is authorized to acquire every kind of property, real, personal or mixed, and every kind of investment, specifically including, but not limited to, corporate obligations of every kind, and stocks, preferred or common, that persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence acquire for their own accounts.

A cemetery owner may select a method to calculate the net earnings of a trust for the first fiscal year in which this subsection (e) is effective, by delivering written instructions to the trustee of the fund no later than sixty (60) days prior to the end of that fiscal year.

A cemetery owner may select a method of calculation to be used for any given fiscal year by using either subdivision (e)(1)(A)(i) or (e)(1)(A)(ii). A cemetery owner shall provide the trustee with written instructions of which method of calculation has been chosen no later than the last day of the preceding fiscal year. In the event that the method of calculation chosen by the cemetery owner prior to the start of the fiscal year would result in lower disbursements than would the other calculation, then the cemetery owner may provide the trustee with written instructions no later than sixty (60) days prior to the end of the fiscal year to change the method of calculation.

In the event that the trustee does not receive written instructions for a given fiscal year from the cemetery owner informing the trustee of the method of calculation chosen or the trustee has never received any written instructions of the method of calculation chosen, then the trustee shall calculate and disburse funds in accordance with subdivision (e)(1)(A)(i).

In order to withdraw up to five percent (5%) of a trust that is already in existence on July 1, 2009, in accordance with subdivision (e)(1)(A)(ii), the current market value of the trust after the withdrawal shall be greater than .90 x [MV(T)+C]. T represents July 1, 2009. MV represents the principal market value of the trust at T. C represents the total contributions made to the trust principal from T to the date that the method of calculation is selected.

In order to withdraw up to five percent (5%) of a trust that is established after July 1, 2009, in accordance with subdivision (e)(1)(A)(ii), the current market value after the withdrawal shall be greater than .90 x [MV(N)+C]. MV(N) represents the principal market value of the trust that will be determined at the end of the trust's fiscal year. C represents contributions made to the principal after the first completed fiscal year.

Disbursements from the trust that are calculated pursuant to subdivision (e)(1)(A)(ii) shall be made on a monthly, quarterly, semiannual or annual basis.

In order for a cemetery owner to receive distributions from the trust that are calculated by using either method of calculation in subdivision (e)(1)(A)(i) or (e)(1)(A)(ii), the cemetery owner shall:

Be current on payment of the annual registration fee. The cemetery owner shall certify to the trustee on forms provided by the commissioner that the cemetery is registered with the department; and

Be current on required deposits to the trust or make payments on any arrearages through special arrangements with the commissioner. At the commissioner's discretion, the commissioner may allow cemetery owners to make payments on arrearages. The cemetery owner shall certify to the trustee on forms provided by the commissioner that the cemetery owner is current on required deposits or is making payments on arrearages.

No cemetery company shall commingle the improvement care funds for the benefit of one (1) cemetery with improvement care funds for the benefit of any other cemetery or with any other funds, and each separate geographical site of a cemetery shall have a separate improvement care fund. However, improvement care funds from more than one (1) cemetery may be commingled by trustees for investment purposes, so long as an accurate accounting is maintained for each individual fund.

The improvement care trust fund shall not be a part of the assets of any cemetery company operating under this part and the improvement care trust fund shall not be subject to the debts of the cemetery company.

For purposes of this section, “cemetery company” includes any individual or entity that leases or rents crypts and niches, even if the individual or entity is not organized, owning, or controlling cemetery lands or property nor conducting the business of a cemetery.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3923; Acts 1953, ch. 44, § 1; 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-110; Acts 1976, ch. 773, § 7; 1978, ch. 605, § 1; 1978, ch. 708, § 6.04; T.C.A., §§ 46-210, 46-2-110; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 780, §§ 5-7; impl. am. Acts 1980, ch. 780, § 1; 1986, ch. 693, §§ 12-17; 1996, ch. 714, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 217, § 1; T.C.A. § 46-2-302; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2009, ch. 356, §§ 3, 4; 2015, ch. 288, §§ 3-6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-302 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

Attorney General Opinions. Liability insurance for trust fund fiduciaries, OAG 97-013, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/6/97).

46-1-205. Payment of dividends — Restrictions — Recovery.

No dividend, salary or compensation of any description shall be paid to any stockholder of any cemetery company or any cemetery operator until the company has first set up the improvement care trust fund in the manner and amount provided in § 46-1-204, and no dividend, salary or compensation shall be paid to any stockholder of any cemetery company or any cemetery operator while any improvement care trust fund is deficient because of not having received the payments required by § 46-1-204; provided, that a receiver, as provided for in this chapter, may pay the salaries and compensation that the receiver deems necessary to restore the cemetery to a sound financial condition. Any dividend, salary or commission paid in violation of this section shall be recoverable at the suit of the commissioner, any lot owner, or descendant or next of kin of a lot owner, in the circuit or chancery court, and all stockholders of the cemetery company and cemetery operators receiving the unlawful dividends, salaries or compensation may be joined in the same suit. The proceeds of the suit or claim shall be added to the improvement care trust fund to assist in making the fund current.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 6; mod. Code 1932, § 3928; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-111; Acts 1976, ch. 773, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 46-211, 46-2-111; T.C.A., § 46-2-305; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-305 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-206. Sales of pre-need cemetery merchandise and services.

Except as provided in this section, no cemetery company shall directly or indirectly offer to or enter into a contract for the sale of cemetery merchandise or services to be used or performed in connection with the interment or commemoration of a deceased human being, if delivery of the cemetery merchandise, other than for incidental additions, such as dates, scrolls, or other supplementary matter representing not more than ten percent (10%) of the total contract price, or performance of the services is to be made more than sixty (60) days after the receipt of any payment under the contract of sale. This subsection (a) includes, but is not limited to, the pre-need sales of cemetery merchandise and services.

If a cemetery company enters into a contract for the sale of cemetery merchandise or services that provides for delivery within sixty (60) days, and the cemetery company fails inexcusably to deliver cemetery merchandise or services within one hundred twenty (120) days after the receipt of any payment under the contract, the cemetery company shall deposit to a pre-need merchandise and services trust account or a pre-need trust account established pursuant to § 46-1-207 all moneys received under the contract.

For purposes of this part, “delivery” includes physical delivery of the cemetery merchandise to the buyer or the cemetery company has paid its supplier for the cemetery merchandise, the supplier has caused the cemetery merchandise to be manufactured and stored, and has caused certificate of ownership of the cemetery merchandise to be sent to the purchaser, and has agreed to ship the cemetery merchandise upon the purchaser's request of the cemetery company; provided, that the cemetery company set aside funds for the installation of the cemetery merchandise pursuant to § 46-1-207.

For the purposes of this part, no person, firm or corporation will be deemed a supplier to a Tennessee cemetery company, unless it:

Permanently and unalterably identifies all cemetery merchandise with the name of the contract beneficiary;

Submits, upon request of the commissioner, a report of all cemetery merchandise that has been purchased through a Tennessee cemetery company and has been placed in storage;

Permits the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, at any time, to examine stored cemetery merchandise that was purchased through a Tennessee cemetery company and to examine any document pertaining to the cemetery merchandise;

Submits evidence to the cemetery company of a bond insuring the existing and good title of any cemetery merchandise due any contract beneficiary purchased through a Tennessee cemetery company; and

Submits evidence to the cemetery company ensuring that all cemetery merchandise purchased through a Tennessee cemetery company and being stored by the supplier is insured for casualty, theft or other loss.

Except as provided in subsection (d), nothing in this part shall apply to contracts for the sale of funeral merchandise and services, such contracts being regulated under title 62, chapter 5, and other general laws of this state.

A cemetery company may offer a pre-need sales contract that covers funeral merchandise as defined in § 62-5-403, or a pre-need sales contract that covers both cemetery merchandise as defined in § 46-1-102 and funeral merchandise, if:

The cemetery company uses a contract issued by the commissioner for general use. If the commissioner has not issued a contract pursuant to this subdivision (d)(1), then the cemetery company may use a contract that has been approved by the commissioner. To submit a contract for approval, the cemetery company shall submit a request for approval to the commissioner prior to the execution of the contract. If the cemetery company has not received approval from the commissioner within sixty (60) days of submitting the request or receives no disapproval of the contract within the sixty-day period, then the contract shall be deemed approved; provided, that the commissioner may disapprove a previously approved contract if the contract violates this section upon giving notice and an opportunity for a hearing to the pre-need seller;

The cemetery company deposits all moneys received for funeral merchandise as defined in § 62-5-403 under the contract in a pre-need merchandise and services trust account or a pre-need trust account established pursuant to § 46-1-207;

The cemetery company complies with the requirements of selling funeral merchandise as provided in the Tennessee Prepaid Funeral Benefits Act, compiled in title 62, chapter 5, part 4; and

The cemetery company submits a price list to the commissioner for the funeral merchandise as defined in § 62-5-403.

Acts 1979, ch. 307, § 4(A); T.C.A., § 46-2-202; Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 20; T.C.A. § 46-2-402; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2016, ch. 911, §§ 5, 6, 16, 18.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9.

46-1-207. Pre-need sales contracts — Pre-need trust accounts.

A sales contract shall be executed in duplicate, and a signed copy given to the purchaser. The contract shall contain the names of the purchaser and the seller and the name of any person, if other than the purchaser, who is to receive the cemetery merchandise or services contracted for, and a description of the cemetery merchandise and services shall appear in the contract.

A pre-need sales contract shall be enforceable against the purchaser, only if:

The seller is a cemetery company owning or operating a duly registered cemetery under this chapter; and

The seller, by the twentieth day of the month following the month of receipt of any consideration paid pursuant to the contract, deposits an amount equal to the procurement costs of the cemetery merchandise and services identified in the sales contract, plus twenty percent (20%) of the costs, in a special general fund trust account in a state or national bank authorized by law to administer trust funds. Upon finding that a cemetery company has failed to appropriately and timely deposit into any trust, the commissioner may, in addition to or in lieu of any other disciplinary action, require that deposits be made within a shorter time frame, after receipt of the funds, for a period not more than two (2) years after the finding of a violation. If the sales contract provides for payment on an installment or deferred basis, the seller may elect to pay into the trust account the pro rata portion relating to procurement cost of each installment or deferred payment received, or to pay one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the procurement cost computed as of the date of sale.

A separate general trust account shall be established and maintained for each cemetery owned or operated by a cemetery company, and each account shall bear the additional legend, “pre-need merchandise and services trust account.”

All deposits required by this part shall be pursuant to a written trust agreement with the trustee that holds the funds. The trust agreement shall:

State the circumstances under which funds will be deposited and disbursed;

Specify the trustee's fees, if any; and

Provide that the trustee shall furnish the trustor an accounting of general trust balances and earnings at least annually.

Specific funds deposited in the trust account shall be identified or earmarked by contract number and the name of the purchaser. Nothing shall prevent the trustee from commingling the deposits in any trust fund for purposes of the management of the trust fund or the investment of funds in the trust fund. The commissioner has the discretion to audit the records and the sources of the records tendered by the trustee and has full power, including power of subpoena, to inspect the records of the trustor. Failure to comply with the subpoena of the commissioner is a Class A misdemeanor.

For purposes of this part, procurement costs shall be the costs of the cemetery merchandise and services as of January 1 of the year in which the pre-need sales contract is executed. These costs shall be determined and substantiated by a wholesale price list of a manufacturer or supplier of the cemetery merchandise so sold or by a cost analysis or itemization of the cost of construction of lawn or mausoleum crypts sold by the cemetery company. The procurement costs so determined shall be the basis for the deposits required by subsection (b) and shall be adjusted and verified annually to the commissioner.

For the purposes of this part, procurement costs for interment services, including, but not limited to, entombment and inurnment services, shall not be less than the following: one hundred sixty-five dollars ($165) for interment services, one hundred ten dollars ($110) for entombment services, and forty-four dollars ($44.00) for inurnment services. The basis for determining the procurement costs for these interment services shall be provided to the commissioner annually and verified at the time of audit. The commissioner shall increase the minimum costs by the consumer price index of each calendar year beginning on January 1, 2007.

All deposits required by this part shall be in cash only.

With respect to pre-need sales of mausoleum crypts, the seller may, in lieu of depositing one hundred twenty percent (120%) of procurement costs, elect to set aside a crypt in inventory comparable to each crypt sold prior to construction; provided, that:

The seller establishes and maintains a record of crypts in inventory reduced by the number set aside under this subsection (g); and

The sales contract conveys interment rights or temporary interment rights pending completion of the crypt sold prior to construction.

Subject to the setting aside provided for in subdivision (g)(1), the seller shall at all times maintain its pre-need merchandise and services trust account in the amount required by subsection (b).

The seller shall offer the purchaser the option to pay any applicable sales or use tax on the selected cemetery merchandise or services at the time the contract is entered into. If the purchaser chooses to pay the tax, it shall be remitted to the department by the seller, and shall be considered full payment for the sales or use tax on the selected cemetery merchandise or services despite any changes in tax rate or cost of cemetery merchandise or services that may occur by the time of actual use. If the purchaser later cancels the pre-need contract, the amount of tax paid shall be refunded by the seller who may then claim that amount as a credit against any sales or use tax then due from the seller.

Acts 1979, ch. 307, §§ 4(B), 4(D); T.C.A., § 46-2-203; Acts 1986, ch. 693, §§ 2, 21; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1996, ch. 958, § 1; 2002, ch. 685, § 1; T.C.A., § 46-2-403; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2016, ch. 911, §§ 8, 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 685, § 2 provided that, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no operator or business licensed pursuant to title 46 shall violate any provision of the Federal Trade Act, U.S. Code title 15, relative to the sale of prearranged funeral plans or burial services.

Former § 46-2-403 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9.

46-1-208. Disposition of trust funds.

The pre-need cemetery merchandise and services trust funds, including the income from the trust funds, after payment of any appropriate trustee fees, commissions and costs, shall remain intact until the cemetery merchandise is delivered or the services performed as specified in the sales contract. However, a seller may, upon proper certification to the trustee, withdraw specific funds previously deposited if no deposit was required by § 46-1-207. Upon complete performance of the services or delivery of the cemetery merchandise specified in the sales contract, the seller shall certify the performance of the services or the delivery of the cemetery merchandise to the trustee by affidavit. Upon the receipt of the certification, the amount of specific funds in the trust account identified to the delivered cemetery merchandise or the performed services, including any income or interest earned from the specific funds and not paid pursuant to subsection (b), shall be paid to the seller. The trustee may rely upon all proper certifications required to be made pursuant to this subsection (a), and shall not be liable to anyone for such reliance.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the trustee shall pay the seller, at the seller's option, the net income accumulated as of the end of any fiscal year; provided, that the trust assets after disbursement of income shall not have a market value of less than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the aggregate procurement costs of all cemetery merchandise and services for which deposits are held in trust, subject to proration allowed under § 46-1-207. The seller shall exercise its option by delivering to the trustee a notarized certification of the procurement costs as of the first day of the seller's current fiscal year.

Any specified funds held on behalf of a purchaser that have been dormant for a period of seventy-five (75) years since the time of deposit or last withdrawal against those moneys, may be considered to be closed accounts against which no further demand will be made by the purchaser, and the principal amount may be paid by the trustee to the seller's improvement care trust.

Acts 1979, ch. 307, § 4(C); T.C.A., § 46-2-204; Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 22; T.C.A. § 46-2-404; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2016, ch. 911, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-404 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9.

46-1-209. Satisfaction of contract — Cancellation of contract — Substitution of cemetery merchandise or services.

If for any reason a cemetery company that has entered into a contract for the sale of cemetery merchandise or services and has made the deposit into the trust funds as required in this part, cannot or does not provide the cemetery merchandise or perform the services called for by the contract within a reasonable time upon request, the purchaser, or the purchaser's heirs or assigns, or duly authorized representatives, shall have the right to provide the cemetery merchandise or services; and, having done so, shall be entitled to receive the deposit to the credit of that particular contract. Written instructions to the trustee by the cemetery company directing the trustee to refund the amount of money on deposit, or an affidavit by either the purchaser, or one (1) of the purchaser's heirs or assigns, or duly authorized representative, stating that the cemetery merchandise or services were not provided, shall be sufficient authority for the trustee to make refund of the funds on deposit to the person submitting the affidavit. However, nothing in this subsection (a) shall relieve the cemetery company from any liability for nonperformance of the contract.

If the purchaser is in default on making payments under the sales contract for a period of ninety (90) consecutive days, the cemetery company shall have the right to cancel the contract and to withdraw from the trust fund the entire balance to the credit of the defaulting purchaser's account as liquidated damages. In that event, the trustee shall deliver the balance to the cemetery company upon its certification of the default by the purchaser; and upon receiving the certification, the trustee may rely on the certification and shall not be liable to anyone for such reliance.

In the event the purchaser, or the purchaser's heirs or assigns, or authorized representatives, desire to substitute cemetery merchandise or services different from that which is specified in the sales contract because of changed conditions or practices in burial customs, the cemetery company shall give credit to the extent of all moneys already paid toward the payment of the substituted cemetery merchandise or services; provided, that the original sales contract has not been completed.

Acts 1979, ch. 307, § 4(E); T.C.A., § 46-2-206; T.C.A., § 46-2-406; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2015, ch. 288, § 7; 2016, ch. 911, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-406 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-210. Waiver invalid.

Any provision of any contract for the sale of cemetery merchandise or the performance of services that purports to waive any of this part shall be null and void.

Acts 1979, ch. 307, § 4(G); T.C.A., § 46-2-208; T.C.A., § 46-2-408; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2016, ch. 911, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-408 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-211. Part applicable to mausoleums, crypts and columbariums.

This part also applies to all corporations, persons, or businesses, except those corporations, persons or businesses owning and operating a cemetery that maintains an improvement care trust fund, and in which the mausoleum is to be, is being, or has been constructed, engaged in the construction and/or sale of mausoleums, crypts, columbariums or other structures constructed for public use, space in which is offered to the public by sale, and constructed wholly or partially above the surface of the ground or partly covered with earth or sod, for the purpose of permanently containing the dead or cremated remains of human bodies.

Acts 1963, ch. 202, § 1; 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-120; T.C.A., §§ 46-220, 46-2-120; T.C.A., § 46-2-303; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-303 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-212. Sale of unconstructed or unfinished mausoleums, crypts and columbariums.

Any corporation, person, or business, except those corporations, persons or businesses owning and operating a cemetery that maintains an improvement care trust fund, and in which the mausoleum is to be, is being, or has been constructed, engaged in the public sale of burial space in a mausoleum, crypt or columbarium that is not completely constructed at the time of a sale, shall withhold the first seventy-five percent (75%) of the proceeds of the sale, to be placed in trust or invested under this part, until such time as the mausoleum, crypt, or columbarium, space in which was sold, is completed. After completion, the improvement care trust fund provided in § 46-1-204 shall apply to the completed structure.

Acts 1963, ch. 202, § 1; 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-121; T.C.A., §§ 46-221, 46-2-121; T.C.A. § 46-2-304; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-304 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-213. Construction of crypts.

A cemetery company shall commence construction or development of any undeveloped ground or building in which lawn or mausoleum crypts are to be constructed and in which sales, contracts for sale, or agreements for sales, are being made, within thirty-six (36) months after the date of the first sale. The construction or development of the undeveloped ground or building shall be completed within five (5) years after the date of the first sale. Failure to complete construction, as represented at the time of the first sale, shall entitle any purchaser, on demand, to recover all sums paid on the purchase price, plus interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum.

Acts 1979, ch. 307, § 4(D); T.C.A., § 46-2-205; T.C.A., § 46-2-405; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-405 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.